Indiana, session 2026, HB1394.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026] (a) The following
definitions apply throughout this SECTION:
(1) "Division of family resources" means the division of
family resources established by IC 12-13-1-1.
(2) "EBT card" has the meaning set forth in 470 IAC 6-0.5-1.
(3) "Secretary of family and social services" means the
secretary of family and social services appointed under
IC 12-8-1.5-2.
(4) "SNAP" means the federal Supplemental Nutrition
Assistance Program under 7 U.S.C. 2011 et seq.
(5) "TANF" means the federal Temporary Assistance for
Needy Families program under 42 U.S.C. 601 et seq.
(b) The division of family resources shall establish a pilot
program under which the division of family resources develops and
deploys electronic kiosks that allow an individual to do any of the
following:
(1) Determine the balance remaining in the individual's SNAP
or TANF account.
2026 IN 1394—LS 6557/DI 119


(2) Apply to the office of the secretary of family and social
services for a new EBT card.
(3) Apply for SNAP or TANF benefits, subject to verification
through in person communication with the division of family
resources.
(c) Not later than December 31, 2028, the director of the division
of family resources shall issue a written report to the secretary of
family and social services that contains the director's:
(1) determination regarding the effectiveness of the kiosks
deployed under subsection (b); and
(2) recommendations regarding wider implementation of the
kiosks, including any recommendations regarding changes to
improve the effectiveness of the kiosks.
(d) This SECTION expires January 1, 2029.
2026 IN 1394—LS 6557/DI 119